ja: ジッパースライダー／プル構成: シングルスライダー (ダブルプル/リバーシブルプル); シングルスライダー (シングルプル); ツースライダー (ダブルプル); ツースライダー (各シングルプル); その他
th: การกำหนดค่าตัวเลื่อน/ดึงซิป: หัวซิปเดี่ยว (ห่วงดึงคู่/ห่วงดึงพลิกได้); หัวซิปเดี่ยว (ห่วงดึงเดี่ยว); หัวซิปคู่ (ห่วงดึงคู่); หัวซิปคู่ (ห่วงดึงเดี่ยวแต่ละหัว); อื่นๆ
de: Konfiguration von Reißverschlussschieber bzw. -zieher: Ein Schieber (Doppelgriff/Wende-Griff); Ein Schieber (Einzelgriff); Zwei Schieber (Doppelgriff); Zwei Schieber (jeweils Einzelgriff); Sonstige
bg-BG: Конфигурация на плъзгача/дръжката на ципа: Единичен плъзгач (двоен/обръщаем водач); Единичен плъзгач (единичен водач); Два плъзгача (двоен водач); Два плъзгача (всеки с единичен водач); Други
ru: Конфигурация бегунков молнии: Один слайдер (двойной/перекидной пуллер); Один слайдер (один пуллер); Два слайдера (двойной пуллер); Два слайдера (с одним пуллером на каждом); Другая
es: Configuración del deslizador/tirador de la cremallera: Deslizador simple (doble tirador/tirador reversible); Deslizador simple (tirador simple); Dos deslizadores (doble tirador); Dos deslizadores (cada uno con tirador simple); Otro
zh-CN: 拉链滑块/拉片配置: 单拉头（双拉片/可翻转拉片）; 单拉头（单拉片）; 双拉头（双拉片）; 双拉头（每个单拉片）; 其他
lt-LT: Užtrauktuko slankiklio / trauktuko konfigūracija: Vienas slankiklis (dvigubas traukiklis / apverčiamas traukiklis); Vienas slankiklis (vienas traukiklis); Du slankikliai (dvigubas traukiklis); Du slankikliai (kiekvienas su vienu traukikliu); Kita
fr: Configuration du curseur et de la tirette: Curseur simple (tirette double/réversible); Curseur simple (tirette simple); Deux curseurs (tirette double); Deux curseurs (à tirette simple chacun); Autre
sl-SI: Konfiguracija drsnika/vlečnega mehanizma zadrge: Enojni drsnik (dvojni poteznik/obrnljiv poteznik); Enojni drsnik (enojni poteznik); Dva drsnika (dvojni poteznik); Dva drsnika (vsak z enojnim poteznikom); Drugo
it: Configurazione del cursore/tirante della cerniera: Cursore singolo (tiretto doppio/tiretto reversibile); Cursore singolo (tiretto singolo); Due cursori (tiretto doppio); Due cursori (ciascuno con tiretto singolo); Altro
ko: 지퍼 슬라이더/당김 손잡이 구성: 단일 슬라이더(이중 손잡이/리버서블 손잡이); 단일 슬라이더(단일 손잡이); 이중 슬라이더(이중 손잡이); 이중 슬라이더(각각 단일 손잡이); 기타
pt-PT: Configuração do cursor/puxador do fecho: Deslizador único (puxador duplo/puxador reversível); Deslizador único (puxador simples); Dois deslizadores (puxador duplo); Dois deslizadores (cada um com puxador simples); Outro
sk-SK: Konfigurácia jazdca/ťahadla zipsu: Jeden bežec (dvojité/obojstranné tiahlo); Jeden bežec (jedno tiahlo); Dva bežce (dvojité tiahlo); Dva bežce (každý s jedným tiahlom); Iné
tr: Fermuar sürgüsü/çekme kolu konfigürasyonu: Tek sürgü (çift elcik/tersine çevrilebilir elcik); Tek sürgü (tek elcik); İki sürgü (çift elcik); İki sürgü (her biri tek elcikli); Diğer
pt-BR: Zíper configuração do cursor/puxador: Cursor simples (puxador duplo/reversível); Cursor simples (puxador simples); Dois cursores (puxador duplo); Dois cursores (cada um com puxador simples); Outros
hu: Cipzárkocsi/-húzó konfigurációja: Egy kocsi (két húzó/kifordítható húzó); Egy kocsi (egy húzó); Két kocsi (két húzó); Két kocsi (mindegyiken egy húzó); Egyéb
el: Διαμόρφωση Διάταξη οδηγών/λαβών φερμουάρ: Μονός οδηγός (διπλή λαβή/αναστρέψιμη λαβή); Μονός οδηγός (μονή λαβή); Δύο οδηγοί (διπλή λαβή); Δύο οδηγοί (από μία μονή λαβή); Άλλο
cs: Konfigurace jezdce/táhla zipu: Jeden jezdec (dvojitý/oboustranný taháček); Jeden jezdec (jeden taháček); Dva jezdci (dvojitý taháček); Dva jezdci (každý má jeden taháček); Jiné
vi: Cấu hình khóa kéo/tay kéo: Con trượt đơn (tay kéo kép/tay kéo lật); Con trượt đơn (tay kéo đơn); Hai con trượt (tay kéo kép); Hai con trượt (mỗi con có tay kéo đơn); Khác
sv: Konfiguration för dragkedja/dragreglage: Enkel löpare (dubbel kläpp/vändbar kläpp); Enkel löpare (enkel kläpp); Två löpare (dubbel kläpp); Två löpare (vardera enkel kläpp); Övrigt
en: Zipper slider/pull configuration: Single slider (double pull/reversible pull); Single slider (single pull); Two sliders (double pull); Two sliders (each single pull); Other
da: Konfiguration af lynlåsskyder eller -trækker: Enkelt skyder (dobbelt vedhæng/vendbart vedhæng); Enkelt skyder (enkelt vedhæng); To skydere (dobbelt vedhæng); To skydere (hver deres enkelte vedhæng); Andet
fi: Vetoketjun vedinkokoonpano: Yksi lukko (kaksipuolinen vedin / käännettävä vedin); Yksi lukko (yksi vedin); Kaksi lukkoa (kaksipuolinen vedin); Kaksi lukkoa (molemmissa yksi vedin); Muu
zh-TW: 拉鍊頭/拉片配置: 單一滑塊 (雙拉頭/可反轉拉片); 單一滑塊 (單拉頭); 雙滑塊 (雙拉頭); 雙滑塊 (各單拉頭); 其他
nl: Ritssluiting schuif-/trekmechanisme configuratie: Enkele schuiver (dubbele trekker/omkeerbare trekker); Enkele schuiver (enkele trekker); Twee schuivers (dubbele trekker); Twee schuivers (elk een enkele trekker); Overig
pl: Konfiguracja suwaka/uchwytu zamka: Pojedynczy suwak (podwójny/odwracalny uchwyt); Pojedynczy suwak (pojedynczy uchwyt); Dwa suwaki (podwójny uchwyt); Dwa suwaki (każdy z pojedynczym uchwytem); Inne
hr-HR: Konfiguracija klizača/povlačenja patentnog zatvarača: Jedan klizač (dvostruki potezač / reverzibilni potezač); Jedan klizač (jedan potezač); Dva klizača (dvostruki potezač); Dva klizača (svaki s jednim potezačem); Ostalo
ro-RO: Configurația cursorului/cheiței fermoarului: Cursor simplu (cheiță dublă/reversibilă); Cursor simplu (cheiță simplă); Două cursoare (cheiță dublă); Două cursoare (fiecare cu cheiță simplă); Altele
nb: Konfigurasjon av glidenøkkel eller glidetrekker: Enkel glidelåsskyver (dobbel eller vendbar glidelåsdrager); Enkel glidelåsskyver (enkel glidelåsdrager); To glidelåsskyvere (dobbel glidelåsdrager); To glidelåsskyvere (enkel glidelåsdrager per skyver); Annet